Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-2,114
Interception; subpoena; enforcement.

(1) If any person refuses to obey a subpoena issued to such person, the Attorney General or a county attorney may invoke the aid of any court of the State of Nebraska within the jurisdiction of which the investigation is carried on or of which the subpoenaed person is an inhabitant, carries on business, or may otherwise be found, to compel compliance with such subpoena.

(2) The court may issue an order requiring the subpoenaed person to appear before the Attorney General or a county attorney to produce records, if so ordered, or to give testimony concerning the matter under investigation. Nothing in this section shall be construed to suspend or otherwise interfere with the operation of the provisions of the Free Flow of Information Act or sections 27-503 to 27-506 and 27-605.

(3) Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof. All process in any such case may be served in the judicial district in which the subpoenaed person is an inhabitant or may otherwise be found.

Laws 1976, LB 583, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 13, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-711;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 176.

Free Flow of Information Act, see section 20-147.